Utah statutes.
76-8-507.   False personal information to peace officer.

(1)  A person commits a class C misdemeanor if, with intent of misleading a peace officer as to the person's identity, birth date, or place of residence, the person knowingly gives a false name, birth date, or address to a peace officer in the lawful discharge of the peace officer's official duties.

(2)  A person commits a class A misdemeanor if, with the intent of leading a peace officer to believe that the person is another actual person, he gives the name, birth date, or address of another person to a peace officer acting in the lawful discharge of the peace officer's official duties.

